Washington statutes.
RCW 35.22.415

Municipal airport located in unincorporated area—Subject to county comprehensive plan and zoning ordinances.

Whenever a first-class city owns and operates a municipal airport which is located in an unincorporated area of a county, the airport shall be subject to the county's comprehensive plan and zoning ordinances in the same manner as if the airport were privately owned and operated.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 124 s 10.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 124: See note following RCW 35A.14.015.